West Virginia, session 2025, HB2144.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 53. ESTABLISHING ADDITIONAL SUBSTANCE ABUSE TREATMENT FACILITIES. §16-53-4. Requirement of substance use disorder treatment services to provide transportation; marketing or partnering prohibited; approval for limitation of eligibility. (a) Substance use disorder inpatient providers in West Virginia shall offer their patients a means of transportation back to the individual’s state of birth, a state they have previously lived in, or a state where they have a family support structure, in order to assist those individuals in their recovery upon discharge from a substance use disorder inpatient provider.(b) West Virginia substance abuse inpatient providers that receive funding from Medicaid are hereby prohibited from marketing or partnering with providers in other states for the purpose of relocating individuals to West Virginia to receive state covered substance use disorder treatment.(c) Medicaid shall seek approval from the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services ("CMS") to limit eligibility for any substance use disorder waiver services to individuals that have established residency in West Virginia for at least six months prior to covered services.